Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201850-1510
Filings; service upon parties.

All filings with the Clerk of the Legislature pursuant to the Legislative Qualifications and Election Contests Act, including pleadings, responses, and motions, shall be served upon each of the parties and shall contain a complete certificate of service.

Laws 2018, LB744, § 17.